Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-938
Division of Adult Services; assistant director; qualifications.

The Director of Correctional Services shall appoint as assistant director of the Division of Adult Services any person who shall have an appropriate background in adult institutional correctional programs and adequate training and experience in correctional administrative work.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 15.